Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB59.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 319.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall consist of eleven (11)[nine (9)] members appointed by the
Governor. Seven (7)[Six (6)] members shall be licensed psychologists. Three
(3)[Two (2)] members shall be credentialed by the board as certified psychologists,
licensed psychological practitioners, or licensed psychological associates. One (1)
member shall be a citizen at large who is not associated with or financially
interested in the practice or business regulated.
(2) Licensed psychologist members shall be appointed by the Governor from a group
consisting of the three (3) nominees receiving the most votes for each position to be
filled, the nominees to be selected by all licensed psychologists credentialed under
this chapter from a list of eligible candidates prepared by the Kentucky
Psychological Association. Candidates shall be solicited from all licensed
psychologists credentialed according to the provisions of this chapter and each
nominee shall be a licensed psychologist credentialed according to the provisions of
this chapter. Each licensed psychologist member shall be a resident of this state and
shall have engaged in the practice or teaching of psychology as a licensed
psychologist for at least three (3) years in this state.
(3) Certified psychologist, licensed psychological practitioner, or licensed
psychological associate members shall be appointed by the Governor from a group
consisting of the three (3) nominees receiving the most votes for each position to be
filled, the nominees to be selected by all certified psychologists, licensed
psychological practitioners, and licensed psychological associates credentialed
under this chapter from a list of eligible candidates prepared by the Kentucky
Psychological Association. Candidates shall be solicited from all certified
psychologists, licensed psychological practitioners, and licensed psychological
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 887
associates credentialed according to the provisions of this chapter. Each nominee
shall be a resident of this state, licensed according to the provisions of this chapter,
and shall have engaged in the practice or teaching of psychology as a certified
psychologist, licensed psychological practitioner, or licensed psychological
associate for at least three (3) years in this state.
(4) The term of each board member shall be four (4) years and until a successor is
appointed and qualified. No member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive full
terms. The Governor shall fill any vacancy occurring in the board in the manner
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section. Upon recommendation by a majority of
the board members and after notice and a hearing, the Governor shall remove any
member for incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office.
(5) Six (6)[Five (5)] members of the board shall constitute a quorum. Each member
shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for attending each meeting and
shall receive his or her necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the
duties required by this chapter. Annually the board shall elect one (1) of its licensed
members as chairperson for a term of one (1) year. No person shall serve more than
two (2) consecutive full terms as chairperson. The board shall meet at least twice
annually and at other times as it determines necessary. Special meetings may be
called by the chairperson and shall be called upon the written request of two (2)
members.
Section 2. KRS 319.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) On June 30 of each year, the board shall submit to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission and post on the board's website a written report that
includes:[including ]
(a) The names of all persons to whom licenses have been granted as provided in
this chapter;
(b) Both the average and modal time it takes the board to issue or deny a
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 887
license after receipt of a complete initial application;
(c) Both the average and modal time between initiation of a disciplinary
complaint and the resolution of the complaint; and
(d) Any cases heard and decisions rendered.
(2) The board may locate its principal office, meet, or conduct any of its business at
any place in this state.
(3) The board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a register of licensed and
certified psychologists, licensed psychological practitioners, and licensed
psychological associates. The books and records of the board shall be prima facie
evidence of the matters therein contained.
Section 3. KRS 319.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before granting a license to practice psychology and to use the title "licensed
psychologist," the board shall require the applicant to pass examinations[an
examination] in psychology as outlined by the board and to fulfill all requirements
for supervised experience.
(2) The applicant shall:
(a) Pay a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300);
(b) Have received a doctoral degree in psychology that is acceptable to the board
from a regionally accredited educational institution; provided, however, the
board may grant a license to an individual otherwise qualified under this
chapter who has received a doctoral degree in psychology that is acceptable to
the board from an educational institution outside the United States, if the
educational institution would otherwise be accredited by a regional
accrediting body if located in the United States;
(c) Have passed the national EPPP examination at the doctoral level;[ and]
(d) Have passed an examination in Kentucky mental health law;
(e) Have passed an examination in the practice of psychology as determined by
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 887
the board; and
(f) Have had at least two (2) years of supervised professional experience
satisfactory to the board, one (1) year of which shall be an internship.
(3) (a) Upon acceptance of the application to sit for the examination in
psychology:[,]
1. The board examination shall be scheduled to occur within thirty (30)
to sixty (60) days, unless the applicant is unable to complete the
examination process due to an accident, illness, or injury, the delay
for which is approved by the board chair or the chair's designee. Any
unapproved delay by the applicant to complete the examination
process may result in the suspension of the applicant's temporary
license until the examination process is completed; and
2. The applicant may practice psychology under the supervision of a
licensed psychologist under conditions of supervision and temporary
licensure established by the board.
(b) The board shall establish a grace period not to exceed one hundred eighty
(180) days to allow for the employment and supervision of the applicant by an
agency from the time the applicant's degree requirements are completed to the
submission of the complete application. During this period of supervision, the
applicant for licensure may not supervise certified psychologists, licensed
psychological associates, other applicants for licensure, or temporarily
licensed persons, nor shall the applicant[he] engage in an independent
practice, except under the employment of his or her supervising psychologist.
Upon certification to the board of completion of the two (2) years of
supervision satisfactory to the board, the applicant shall be examined on
psychological practice, ethical principles, and the law.
(4) The board shall grade and keep the examinations and results on file for one (1) year.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 887
Upon written request to the board, an applicant may arrange to discuss his or her
performance on the examination.
(5) Upon successful completion of the examination process, the board shall issue a
license to practice psychology and the applicant may use the title "licensed
psychologist."
(6) Licensed psychologists may function independently without supervision. Licensed
psychologists who have the designation "health service provider" may retain that
designation and may employ and supervise certified psychologists and licensed
psychological associates. Licensed psychologists who have the designation "health
service provider" may supervise no more than a total of six (6) certified
psychologists, licensed psychological associates, or applicants for licensure at one
(1) time.
(7) The designation "health service provider" shall be made on the license of those
licensed psychologists who have completed one (1) additional year of supervised
experience satisfactory to the board in health care service delivery. This year of
supervised experience shall be in addition to the supervised experience requirement
for licensure as a licensed psychologist. Health service providers may provide
supervision of direct health care services by applicants for licensure, certified
psychologists, and licensed psychological associates. Health service providers may
supervise no more than a total of six (6) certified psychologists, licensed
psychological associates, or applicants for licensure at one (1) time.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:39 PM Jacketed